Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-2425
Special assessment; file petition on appeal and transcript with district court; time.

The owner appealing a special assessment pursuant to section 19-2422 shall file his or her petition on appeal in the district court, together with a transcript of the proceedings before the city or village, within thirty days from the date of the levy of such special assessment.

Laws 1975, LB 468, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 163.

A landowner's right to challenge the validity and amount of a special assessment pursuant to section 19-2422 is not waived when such landowner attains a deferral of payment of the assessment, pursuant to sections 19-2425 to 19-2431. Brown v. City of York, 227 Neb. 183, 416 N.W.2d 574 (1987).